Ohio, session 136, HB304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3313.48, 3313.603, 3314.03, 8
3326.11, and 3328.24 be amended and section 3313.6025 of the 9
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 10
Sec. 3313.48. (A) The board of education of each city, 11
exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district 12
shall provide for the free education of the youth of school age 13
within the district under its jurisdiction, at such places as 14
will be most convenient for the attendance of the largest number 15
thereof. Each school so provided and each chartered nonpublic 16
school shall be open for instruction with pupils in attendance, 17
including scheduled classes, supervised activities, and approved 18
education options but excluding lunch and breakfast periods and 19
extracurricular activities, for not less than four hundred 20
fifty-five hours in the case of pupils in kindergarten unless 21

H. B. No. 304 Page 2
As Introduced
such pupils are provided all-day kindergarten, as defined in 22
section 3321.05 of the Revised Code, in which case the pupils 23
shall be in attendance for nine hundred ten hours; nine hundred 24
ten hours in the case of pupils in grades one through six; and 25
one thousand one hours in the case of pupils in grades seven 26
through twelve in each school year, which may include all of the 27
following: 28
(1) Up to the equivalent of two school days per year 29
during which pupils would otherwise be in attendance but are not 30
required to attend for the purpose of individualized parent- 31
teacher conferences and reporting periods; 32
(2) Up to the equivalent of two school days per year 33
during which pupils would otherwise be in attendance but are not 34
required to attend for professional meetings of teachers; 35
(3) Morning and afternoon recess periods of not more than 36
fifteen thirty minutes duration per period for pupils in grades 37
kindergarten through sixeight. 38
(B) Not later than thirty days prior to adopting a school 39
calendar, the board of education of each city, exempted village, 40
and local school district shall hold a public hearing on the 41
school calendar, addressing topics that include, but are not 42
limited to, the total number of hours in a school year, length 43
of school day, and beginning and end dates of instruction. The 44
public hearing required under this division need not be a 45
separate, individual hearing and may be part of another public 46
hearing or board meeting. 47
(C) No school operated by a city, exempted village, local, 48
or joint vocational school district shall reduce the number of 49
hours in each school year that the school is scheduled to be 50

H. B. No. 304 Page 3
As Introduced
open for instruction from the number of hours per year the 51
school was open for instruction during the previous school year 52
unless the reduction is approved by a resolution adopted by the 53
district board of education. Any reduction so approved shall not 54
result in fewer hours of instruction per school year than the 55
applicable number of hours required under division (A) of this 56
section. 57
(D) Prior to making any change in the hours or days in 58
which a high school under its jurisdiction is open for 59
instruction, the board of education of each city, exempted 60
village, and local school district shall consider the 61
compatibility of the proposed change with the scheduling needs 62
of any joint vocational school district in which any of the high 63
school's students are also enrolled. The board shall consider 64
the impact of the proposed change on student access to the 65
instructional programs offered by the joint vocational school 66
district, incentives for students to participate in career- 67
technical education, transportation, and the timing of 68
graduation. The board shall provide the joint vocational school 69
district board with advance notice of the proposed change and 70
the two boards shall enter into a written agreement prescribing 71
reasonable accommodations to meet the scheduling needs of the 72
joint vocational school district prior to implementation of the 73
change. 74
(E) Subject to section 3327.016 of the Revised Code, prior 75
to making any change in the hours or days in which a school 76
under its jurisdiction is open for instruction, the board of 77
education of each city, exempted village, and local school 78
district shall consider the compatibility of the proposed change 79
with the scheduling needs of any community school established 80
under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code to which the district is 81

H. B. No. 304 Page 4
As Introduced
required to transport students under sections 3314.09 and 82
3327.01 of the Revised Code. The board shall consider the impact 83
of the proposed change on student access to the instructional 84
programs offered by the community school, transportation, and 85
the timing of graduation. The board shall provide the sponsor, 86
governing authority, and operator of the community school with 87
advance notice of the proposed change, and the board and the 88
governing authority, or operator if such authority is delegated 89
to the operator, shall enter into a written agreement 90
prescribing reasonable accommodations to meet the scheduling 91
needs of the community school prior to implementation of the 92
change. 93
(F) Subject to section 3327.016 of the Revised Code, prior 94
to making any change in the hours or days in which the schools 95
under its jurisdiction are open for instruction, the board of 96
education of each city, exempted village, and local school 97
district shall consult with the chartered nonpublic schools to 98
which the district is required to transport students under 99
section 3327.01 of the Revised Code and shall consider the 100
effect of the proposed change on the schedule for transportation 101
of those students to their nonpublic schools. The governing 102
authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall consult with 103
each school district board of education that transports students 104
to the chartered nonpublic school under section 3327.01 of the 105
Revised Code prior to making any change in the hours or days in 106
which the nonpublic school is open for instruction. 107
(G) The department of education and workforce shall not 108
adopt or enforce any rule or standard that imposes on chartered 109
nonpublic schools the procedural requirements imposed on school 110
districts by divisions (B), (C), (D), and (E) of this section. 111

H. B. No. 304 Page 5
As Introduced
Sec. 3313.603. (A) As used in this section: 112
(1) "One unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours 113
of course instruction, except that for a laboratory course, "one 114
unit" means a minimum of one hundred fifty hours of course 115
instruction. 116
(2) "One-half unit" means a minimum of sixty hours of 117
course instruction, except that for physical education courses, 118
"one-half unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of 119
course instruction. 120
(3) "Club sports" includes both of the following: 121
(a) A sport sanctioned by a school, but not regulated by 122
an organization that regulates interscholastic conferences or 123
events and is limited to participants under nineteen years of 124
age; 125
(b) A youth sports organization as defined in section 126
3707.51 of the Revised Code. 127
(4) "Other athletic activity" means a sport or physical 128
activity taught by an instructor outside of school. 129
(B) Beginning September 15, 2001, except as required in 130
division (C) of this section and division (C) of section 131
3313.614 of the Revised Code, the requirements for graduation 132
from every high school shall include twenty units earned in 133
grades nine through twelve and shall be distributed as follows: 134
(1) English language arts, four units; 135
(2) Health, one-half unit; 136
(3) Mathematics, three units; 137
(4) Physical education, one-half unit; 138

H. B. No. 304 Page 6
As Introduced
(5) Science, two units until September 15, 2003, and three 139
units thereafter, which at all times shall include both of the 140
following: 141
(a) Biological sciences, one unit; 142
(b) Physical sciences, one unit. 143
(6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply 144
with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the 145
following: 146
(a) American history, one-half unit; 147
(b) American government, one-half unit. 148
(7) Social studies, two units. 149
Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the 150
first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of 151
instruction prescribed by division (B)(7) of this section shall 152
include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of 153
world history and civilizations. 154
(8) Elective units, seven units until September 15, 2003, 155
and six units thereafter. 156
Each student's electives shall include at least one unit, 157
or two half units, chosen from among the areas of 158
business/technology, fine arts, and/or foreign language. 159
(C) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the 160
first time on or after July 1, 2010, except as provided in 161
divisions (D) to (F) of this section, the requirements for 162
graduation from every public and chartered nonpublic high school 163
shall include twenty units that are designed to prepare students 164
for the workforce and college. The units shall be distributed as 165

H. B. No. 304 Page 7
As Introduced
follows: 166
(1) English language arts, four units; 167
(2) Health, one-half unit, which shall include instruction 168
in nutrition and the benefits of nutritious foods and physical 169
activity for overall health; 170
(3) Mathematics, four units, which shall include one unit 171
of algebra II or the equivalent of algebra II, or one unit of 172
advanced computer science as described in the standards adopted 173
pursuant to division (A)(4) of section 3301.079 of the Revised 174
Code. However, students who enter ninth grade for the first time 175
on or after July 1, 2015, and who are pursuing a career- 176
technical instructional track shall not be required to take 177
algebra II or advanced computer science, and instead may 178
complete a career-based pathway mathematics course approved by 179
the department of education and workforce as an alternative. 180
For students who choose to take advanced computer science 181
in lieu of algebra II under division (C)(3) of this section, the 182
school shall communicate to those students that some 183
institutions of higher education may require algebra II for the 184
purpose of college admission. Also, the parent, guardian, or 185
legal custodian of each student who chooses to take advanced 186
computer science in lieu of algebra II shall sign and submit to 187
the school a document containing a statement acknowledging that 188
not taking algebra II may have an adverse effect on college 189
admission decisions. 190
A student may fulfill one unit of mathematics under 191
division (C)(3) of this section by completing one-half unit of 192
financial literacy instruction to satisfy the requirement 193
prescribed under division (C)(9) of this section and one-half 194

H. B. No. 304 Page 8
As Introduced
unit of a mathematics course. The one-half unit course in 195
mathematics shall not be in algebra II, or its equivalent, or a 196
course for which the department requires an end-of-course 197
examination under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. 198
Students who choose to take one unit of advanced computer 199
science in lieu of algebra II, as described in division (C)(3) 200
of this section, shall not be permitted to complete one-half 201
unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the 202
mathematics unit requirements of that division. Instead, those 203
students shall be required to complete the one-half unit of 204
financial literacy instruction under division (C)(8) of this 205
section. 206
(4) Physical education, one-half unit; 207
(5) Science, three units with inquiry-based laboratory 208
experience that engages students in asking valid scientific 209
questions and gathering and analyzing information, which shall 210
include the following, or their equivalent: 211
(a) Physical sciences, one unit; 212
(b) Life sciences, one unit; 213
(c) Advanced study in one or more of the following 214
sciences, one unit: 215
(i) Chemistry, physics, or other physical science; 216
(ii) Advanced biology or other life science; 217
(iii) Astronomy, physical geology, or other earth or space 218
science; 219
(iv) Computer science. 220
No student shall substitute a computer science course for 221

H. B. No. 304 Page 9
As Introduced
a life sciences or biology course under division (C)(5) of this 222
section. 223
(6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply 224
with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the 225
following: 226
(a) American history, one-half unit; 227
(b) American government, one-half unit. 228
(7) Social studies, two units. 229
Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the 230
first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of 231
instruction prescribed by division (C)(7) of this section shall 232
include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of 233
world history and civilizations. 234
(8) Five units consisting of one or any combination of 235
foreign language, fine arts, business, career-technical 236
education, family and consumer sciences, technology which may 237
include computer science, agricultural education, a junior 238
reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the 239
congress of the United States under title 10 of the United 240
States Code, or English language arts, mathematics, science, or 241
social studies courses not otherwise required under division (C) 242
of this section. 243
One-half unit of instruction under division (C)(8) of this 244
section may be instruction in financial literacy to satisfy the 245
requirement under division (C)(9) of this section. 246
(9)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this 247
section, for students who enter ninth grade for the first time 248
on or after July 1, 2022, financial literacy, one-half unit. 249

H. B. No. 304 Page 10
As Introduced
Each student shall elect to complete the one-half unit of 250
instruction in financial literacy either in lieu of one-half 251
unit of instruction in mathematics under division (C)(3) of this 252
section or an elective under division (C)(8) of this section. A 253
student may fulfill the financial literacy instruction 254
requirement under division (C)(9) of this section through the 255
successful completion of an advanced placement course in 256
microeconomics or macroeconomics. 257
(b) A student attending a nonpublic school accredited 258
through the independent schools association of the central 259
states or any other chartered nonpublic school shall not be 260
required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy 261
instruction prescribed in division (C)(9)(a) of this section, 262
unless that student is attending the school under a state 263
scholarship program as defined in section 3301.0711 of the 264
Revised Code. 265
The study and instruction of financial literacy required 266
under division (C)(9) of this section shall align with the 267
academic content standards for financial literacy and 268
entrepreneurship adopted under division (A)(2) of section 269
3301.079 of the Revised Code. The instruction provided under an 270
advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics 271
shall be considered to be aligned with those academic content 272
standards. In developing the curriculum for the study and 273
instruction of financial literacy, schools may use available 274
public-private partnerships and resources and materials that 275
exist in business, industry, and through the centers for 276
economics education at institutions of higher education. 277
Ohioans must be prepared to apply increased knowledge and 278
skills in the workplace and to adapt their knowledge and skills 279

H. B. No. 304 Page 11
As Introduced
quickly to meet the rapidly changing conditions of the twenty- 280
first century. National studies indicate that all high school 281
graduates need the same academic foundation, regardless of the 282
opportunities they pursue after graduation. The goal of Ohio's 283
system of elementary and secondary education is to prepare all 284
students for and seamlessly connect all students to success in 285
life beyond high school graduation, regardless of whether the 286
next step is entering the workforce, beginning an 287
apprenticeship, engaging in post-secondary training, serving in 288
the military, or pursuing a college degree. 289
The requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) 290
of this section are the standard expectation for all students 291
entering ninth grade for the first time at a public or chartered 292
nonpublic high school on or after July 1, 2010. A student may 293
satisfy this expectation through a variety of methods, 294
including, but not limited to, integrated, applied, career- 295
technical, and traditional coursework. 296
Stronger coordination between high schools and 297
institutions of higher education is necessary to prepare 298
students for more challenging academic endeavors and to lessen 299
the need for academic remediation in college, thereby reducing 300
the costs of higher education for Ohio's students, families, and 301
the state. The department and the chancellor of higher education 302
shall develop policies to ensure that only in rare instances 303
will students who complete the requirements for graduation 304
prescribed in division (C) of this section require academic 305
remediation after high school. 306
School districts, community schools, and chartered 307
nonpublic schools shall integrate technology into learning 308
experiences across the curriculum in order to maximize 309

H. B. No. 304 Page 12
As Introduced
efficiency, enhance learning, and prepare students for success 310
in the technology-driven twenty-first century. Districts and 311
schools shall use distance and web-based course delivery as a 312
method of providing or augmenting all instruction required under 313
this division, including laboratory experience in science. 314
Districts and schools shall utilize technology access and 315
electronic learning opportunities provided by the broadcast 316
educational media commission, chancellor, the Ohio learning 317
network, education technology centers, public television 318
stations, and other public and private providers. 319
(D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, a 320
student who enters ninth grade on or after July 1, 2010, and 321
before July 1, 2016, may qualify for graduation from a public or 322
chartered nonpublic high school even though the student has not 323
completed the requirements for graduation prescribed in division 324
(C) of this section if all of the following conditions are 325
satisfied: 326
(1) During the student's third year of attending high 327
school, as determined by the school, the student and the 328
student's parent, guardian, or custodian sign and file with the 329
school a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, 330
or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without 331
completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in 332
division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one 333
consequence of not completing those requirements is 334
ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio 335
without further coursework. 336
(2) The student and parent, guardian, or custodian fulfill 337
any procedural requirements the school stipulates to ensure the 338
student's and parent's, guardian's, or custodian's informed 339

H. B. No. 304 Page 13
As Introduced
consent and to facilitate orderly filing of statements under 340
division (D)(1) of this section. Annually, each district or 341
school shall notify the department of the number of students who 342
choose to qualify for graduation under division (D) of this 343
section and the number of students who complete the student's 344
success plan and graduate from high school. 345
(3) The student and the student's parent, guardian, or 346
custodian and a representative of the student's high school 347
jointly develop a student success plan for the student in the 348
manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 of the 349
Revised Code that specifies the student matriculating to a two- 350
year degree program, acquiring a business and industry- 351
recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeship. 352
(4) The student's high school provides counseling and 353
support for the student related to the plan developed under 354
division (D)(3) of this section during the remainder of the 355
student's high school experience. 356
(5)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(5)(b) of this 357
section, the student successfully completes, at a minimum, the 358
curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section. 359
(b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the 360
first time on or after July 1, 2014, a student shall be required 361
to complete successfully, at the minimum, the curriculum 362
prescribed in division (B) of this section, except as follows: 363
(i) Mathematics, four units, one unit which shall be one 364
of the following: 365
(I) Probability and statistics; 366
(II) Computer science; 367

H. B. No. 304 Page 14
As Introduced
(III) Applied mathematics or quantitative reasoning; 368
(IV) Any other course approved by the department using 369
standards established by the superintendent not later than 370
October 1, 2014. 371
(ii) Elective units, five units; 372
(iii) Science, three units as prescribed by division (B) 373
of this section which shall include inquiry-based laboratory 374
experience that engages students in asking valid scientific 375
questions and gathering and analyzing information. 376
(E) Each school district and chartered nonpublic school 377
retains the authority to require an even more challenging 378
minimum curriculum for high school graduation than specified in 379
division (B) or (C) of this section. A school district board of 380
education, through the adoption of a resolution, or the 381
governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may 382
stipulate any of the following: 383
(1) A minimum high school curriculum that requires more 384
than twenty units of academic credit to graduate; 385
(2) An exception to the district's or school's minimum 386
high school curriculum that is comparable to the exception 387
provided in division (D) of this section but with additional 388
requirements, which may include a requirement that the student 389
successfully complete more than the minimum curriculum 390
prescribed in division (B) of this section; 391
(3) That no exception comparable to that provided in 392
division (D) of this section is available. 393
If a school district or chartered nonpublic school 394
requires a foreign language as an additional graduation 395

H. B. No. 304 Page 15
As Introduced
requirement under division (E) of this section, a student may 396
apply one unit of instruction in computer coding to satisfy one 397
unit of foreign language. If a student applies more than one 398
computer coding course to satisfy the foreign language 399
requirement, the courses shall be sequential and progressively 400
more difficult. 401
(F) A student enrolled in a dropout prevention and 402
recovery program, which program has received a waiver from the 403
department, may qualify for graduation from high school by 404
successfully completing a competency-based instructional program 405
administered by the dropout prevention and recovery program in 406
lieu of completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in 407
division (C) of this section. The department shall grant a 408
waiver to a dropout prevention and recovery program, within 409
sixty days after the program applies for the waiver, if the 410
program meets all of the following conditions: 411
(1) The program serves only students not younger than 412
sixteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age. 413
(2) The program enrolls students who, at the time of their 414
initial enrollment, either, or both, are at least one grade 415
level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that 416
significantly interfere with their academic progress such that 417
they are prevented from continuing their traditional programs. 418
(3) The program requires students to attain at least the 419
applicable score designated for each of the assessments 420
prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the 421
Revised Code or, to the extent prescribed by rule of the 422
department under division (D)(5) of section 3301.0712 of the 423
Revised Code, division (B)(2) of that section. 424

H. B. No. 304 Page 16
As Introduced
(4) The program develops a student success plan for the 425
student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 426
3313.6020 of the Revised Code that specifies the student's 427
matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business 428
and industry-recognized credential, or entering an 429
apprenticeship. 430
(5) The program provides counseling and support for the 431
student related to the plan developed under division (F)(4) of 432
this section during the remainder of the student's high school 433
experience. 434
(6) The program requires the student and the student's 435
parent, guardian, or custodian to sign and file, in accordance 436
with procedural requirements stipulated by the program, a 437
written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or 438
custodian's consent to the student's graduating without 439
completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in 440
division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one 441
consequence of not completing those requirements is 442
ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio 443
without further coursework. 444
(7) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has 445
submitted to the department an instructional plan that 446
demonstrates how the academic content standards adopted by the 447
department under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code will be 448
taught and assessed. 449
(8) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has 450
submitted to the department a policy on career advising that 451
satisfies the requirements of section 3313.6020 of the Revised 452
Code, with an emphasis on how every student will receive career 453
advising. 454

H. B. No. 304 Page 17
As Introduced
(9) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has 455
submitted to the department a written agreement outlining the 456
future cooperation between the program and any combination of 457
local job training, postsecondary education, nonprofit, and 458
health and social service organizations to provide services for 459
students in the program and their families. 460
Divisions (F)(8) and (9) of this section apply only to 461
waivers granted on or after July 1, 2015. 462
If the department does not act either to grant the waiver 463
or to reject the program application for the waiver within sixty 464
days as required under this section, the waiver shall be 465
considered to be granted. 466
(G) Every high school may permit students below the ninth 467
grade to take advanced work. If a high school so permits, it 468
shall award high school credit for successful completion of the 469
advanced work and shall count such advanced work toward the 470
graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section 471
if the advanced work was both: 472
(1) Taught by a person who possesses a license or 473
certificate issued under section 3301.071, 3319.22, or 3319.222 474
of the Revised Code that is valid for teaching high school; 475
(2) Designated by the board of education of the city, 476
local, or exempted village school district, the board of the 477
cooperative education school district, or the governing 478
authority of the chartered nonpublic school as meeting the high 479
school curriculum requirements. 480
Each high school shall record on the student's high school 481
transcript all high school credit awarded under division (G) of 482
this section. In addition, if the student completed a seventh- 483

H. B. No. 304 Page 18
As Introduced
or eighth-grade fine arts course described in division (K) of 484
this section and the course qualified for high school credit 485
under that division, the high school shall record that course on 486
the student's high school transcript. 487
(H) The department shall make its individual academic 488
career plan available through its Ohio career information system 489
web site for districts and schools to use as a tool for 490
communicating with and providing guidance to students and 491
families in selecting high school courses. 492
(I) A school district or chartered nonpublic school may 493
integrate academic content in a subject area for which the 494
department has adopted standards under section 3301.079 of the 495
Revised Code into a course in a different subject area, 496
including a career-technical education course, in accordance 497
with guidance for integrated coursework developed by the 498
department. Upon successful completion of an integrated course, 499
a student may receive credit for both subject areas that were 500
integrated into the course. Units earned for subject area 501
content delivered through integrated academic and career- 502
technical instruction are eligible to meet the graduation 503
requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section. 504
For purposes of meeting graduation requirements, if an 505
end-of-course examination has been prescribed under section 506
3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the subject area delivered 507
through integrated instruction, the school district or school 508
may administer the related subject area examinations upon the 509
student's completion of the integrated course. 510
Nothing in division (I) of this section shall be construed 511
to excuse any school district, chartered nonpublic school, or 512
student from any requirement in the Revised Code related to 513

H. B. No. 304 Page 19
As Introduced
curriculum, assessments, or the awarding of a high school 514
diploma. 515
(J)(1) The department, in consultation with the 516
chancellor, shall adopt a statewide plan implementing methods 517
for students to earn units of high school credit based on a 518
demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in 519
combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. The 520
plan shall include a standard method for recording demonstrated 521
proficiency on high school transcripts. Each school district and 522
community school shall comply with the department's plan adopted 523
under this division and award units of high school credit in 524
accordance with the plan. The department may adopt existing 525
methods for earning high school credit based on a demonstration 526
of subject area competency as necessary prior to the 2009-2010 527
school year. 528
(2) The department shall update the statewide plan adopted 529
pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section to also include 530
methods for students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to 531
meet curriculum requirements based on a demonstration of subject 532
area competency, instead of or in combination with completing 533
hours of classroom instruction. Beginning with the 2017-2018 534
school year, each school district and community school also 535
shall comply with the updated plan adopted pursuant to this 536
division and permit students enrolled in seventh and eighth 537
grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area 538
competency in accordance with the plan. 539
(3) The department shall develop a framework for school 540
districts and community schools to use in granting units of high 541
school credit to students who demonstrate subject area 542
competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, 543

H. B. No. 304 Page 20
As Introduced
or cooperative education. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school 544
year, each district and community school shall comply with the 545
framework. Each district and community school also shall review 546
any policy it has adopted regarding the demonstration of subject 547
area competency to identify ways to incorporate work-based 548
learning experiences, internships, and cooperative education 549
into the policy in order to increase student engagement and 550
opportunities to earn units of high school credit. 551
(K) This division does not apply to students who qualify 552
for graduation from high school under division (D) or (F) of 553
this section, or to students pursuing a career-technical 554
instructional track as determined by the school district board 555
of education or the chartered nonpublic school's governing 556
authority. Nevertheless, the general assembly encourages such 557
students to consider enrolling in a fine arts course as an 558
elective. 559
Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the 560
first time on or after July 1, 2010, each student enrolled in a 561
public or chartered nonpublic high school shall complete two 562
semesters or the equivalent of fine arts to graduate from high 563
school. The coursework may be completed in any of grades seven 564
to twelve. Each student who completes a fine arts course in 565
grade seven or eight may elect to count that course toward the 566
five units of electives required for graduation under division 567
(C)(8) of this section, if the course satisfied the requirements 568
of division (G) of this section. In that case, the high school 569
shall award the student high school credit for the course and 570
count the course toward the five units required under division 571
(C)(8) of this section. If the course in grade seven or eight 572
did not satisfy the requirements of division (G) of this 573
section, the high school shall not award the student high school 574

H. B. No. 304 Page 21
As Introduced
credit for the course but shall count the course toward the two 575
semesters or the equivalent of fine arts required by this 576
division. 577
(L) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 578
section, the board of education of each school district and the 579
governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt 580
a policy to excuse from the high school physical education 581
requirement each student who, during high school, has 582
participated in interscholastic athletics, club sports, marching 583
band, show choir, or cheerleading for at least two full seasons, 584
in other athletic activities for at least one hundred twenty 585
hours, or in the junior reserve officer training corps for at 586
least two full school years. If the board or authority adopts 587
such a policy, the board or authority shall not require the 588
student to complete any physical education course as a condition 589
to graduate. However, the student shall be required to complete 590
one-half unit, consisting of at least sixty hours of 591
instruction, in another course of study. In the case of a 592
student who has participated in the junior reserve officer 593
training corps for at least two full school years, credit 594
received for that participation may be used to satisfy the 595
requirement to complete one-half unit in another course of 596
study. 597
(M) It is important that high school students learn and 598
understand United States history and the governments of both the 599
United States and the state of Ohio. Therefore, beginning with 600
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 601
July 1, 2012, the study of American history and American 602
government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this 603
section shall include the study of all of the following 604
documents: 605

H. B. No. 304 Page 22
As Introduced
(1) The Declaration of Independence; 606
(2) The Northwest Ordinance; 607
(3) The Constitution of the United States with emphasis on 608
the Bill of Rights; 609
(4) The Ohio Constitution. 610
The study of each of the documents prescribed in divisions 611
(M)(1) to (4) of this section shall include study of that 612
document in its original context. 613
The study of American history and government required by 614
divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the 615
historical evidence of the role of documents such as the 616
Federalist Papers and the Anti-Federalist Papers to firmly 617
establish the historical background leading to the establishment 618
of the provisions of the Constitution and Bill of Rights. 619
(N) A student may apply one unit of instruction in 620
computer science to satisfy one unit of mathematics or one unit 621
of science under division (C) of this section as the student 622
chooses, regardless of the field of certification of the teacher 623
who teaches the course, so long as that teacher meets the 624
licensure requirements prescribed by section 3319.236 of the 625
Revised Code and, prior to teaching the course, completes a 626
professional development program determined to be appropriate by 627
the district board. 628
If a student applies more than one computer science course 629
to satisfy curriculum requirements under that division, the 630
courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult or 631
cover different subject areas within computer science. 632
(O) Any high school student who participates in a club 633

H. B. No. 304 Page 23
As Introduced
sport or other athletic activity under division (L) of this 634
section shall submit a signed statement attesting that the 635
student has met the requirements under that division to the 636
school district board of education or the chartered nonpublic 637
school governing authority of the school in which the student is 638
enrolled. The statement shall include signatures from the coach 639
of the club sport or instructor of the athletic activity and the 640
student's parent or guardian. 641
Sec. 3313.6025. The board of education of each school 642
district shall provide morning and afternoon recess periods of 643
at least thirty minutes duration per period each school day for 644
students enrolled in kindergarten through eighth grade. A 645
district is not required to provide recess time under this 646
section on any school day that a student is attending a physical 647
education course. 648
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 649
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 650
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 651
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 652
contract filed with the director under this section. 653
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 654
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 655
following: 656
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 657
following: 658
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 659
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 660
2003; 661
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 662

H. B. No. 304 Page 24
As Introduced
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 663
(2) The education program of the school, including the 664
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 665
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 666
focus of the curriculum; 667
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 668
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 669
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 670
assessments; 671
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 672
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 673
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 674
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 675
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 676
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 677
Code; 678
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 679
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 680
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 681
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 682
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 683
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 684
student. 685
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 686
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 687
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 688
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 689
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 690

H. B. No. 304 Page 25
As Introduced
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 691
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 692
117.10 of the Revised Code. 693
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 694
to be used that contains at least the following information: 695
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 696
instructional purposes; 697
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 698
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 699
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 700
that are paid by the school; 701
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 702
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 703
operator, if any. 704
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 705
following: 706
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 707
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 708
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 709
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 710
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 711
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 712
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 713
any position. 714
(11) That the school will comply with the following 715
requirements: 716
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 717

H. B. No. 304 Page 26
As Introduced
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 718
twenty hours per school year. 719
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 720
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 721
the school. 722
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 723
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 724
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 725
religious institution. 726
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 727
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 728
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 729
3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 730
3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 731
3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 732
3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 733
3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 734
3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 735
3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 736
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 737
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 738
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 739
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 740
3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 741
3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 742
3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 743
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 744
2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the 745
Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply 746
with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner 747

H. B. No. 304 Page 27
As Introduced
specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. 748
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 749
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 750
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 751
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 752
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 753
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 754
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 755
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 756
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 757
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 758
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 759
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 760
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 761
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 762
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 763
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 764
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 765
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 766
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 767
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 768
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 769
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 770
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 771
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 772
subject area competency adopted by the department under 773
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 774
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 775
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 776
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 777
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 778

H. B. No. 304 Page 28
As Introduced
cooperative education developed by the department under division 779
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 780
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 781
months after the end of each school year a report of its 782
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 783
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 784
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 785
in the school. 786
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 787
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 788
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 789
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 790
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 791
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 792
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 793
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 794
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 795
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 796
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 797
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 798
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 799
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 800
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 801
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 802
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 803
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 804
unless it is either of the following: 805
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 806
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 807

H. B. No. 304 Page 29
As Introduced
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 808
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 809
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 810
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 811
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 812
Revised Code. 813
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 814
to employees; 815
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 816
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 817
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 818
(E) of this section. 819
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 820
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 821
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 822
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 823
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 824
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 825
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 826
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 827
Revised Code; 828
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 829
or part of an existing public school or educational service 830
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 831
a converted public school or service center building, 832
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 833
that the board of education or service center governing board 834
that operated the school or building before conversion is 835
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 836

H. B. No. 304 Page 30
As Introduced
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 837
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 838
agreement applicable to such employees; 839
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 840
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 841
governing authority of the community school; 842
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 843
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 844
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 845
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 846
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 847
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 848
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 849
the district in which the school is located; 850
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 851
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 852
located; 853
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 854
other district in the state. 855
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 856
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 857
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 858
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 859
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 860
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 861
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 862
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 863
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 864

H. B. No. 304 Page 31
As Introduced
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 865
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 866
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 867
(b) The authority of the department as the community 868
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 869
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 870
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 871
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 872
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 873
action. 874
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 875
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 876
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 877
with criteria for student participation established by the 878
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 879
Revised Code; 880
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 881
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 882
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 883
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 884
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 885
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 886
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 887
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 888
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 889
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 890
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 891
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 892
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 893

H. B. No. 304 Page 32
As Introduced
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 894
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 895
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 896
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 897
policies will be available for public inspection; 898
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 899
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 900
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 901
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 902
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 903
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 904
the Revised Code; 905
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 906
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 907
of the following information: 908
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 909
will be used; 910
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 911
be determined and documented; 912
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 913
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 914
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 915
the school will document participation in learning 916
opportunities; 917
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 918
monitored; 919
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 920
be protected; 921

H. B. No. 304 Page 33
As Introduced
(g) A description of the professional development 922
activities that will be offered to teachers. 923
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 924
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 925
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 926
interest at a fair market rate; 927
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 928
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 929
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 930
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 931
contracted. 932
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 933
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 934
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 935
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 936
the parent's or student's primary residence. 937
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 938
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 939
students enrolling in or attending the school. 940
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 941
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 942
following: 943
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 944
school will be selected in the future; 945
(2) The management and administration of the school; 946
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 947
school or educational service center building, alternative 948
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 949

H. B. No. 304 Page 34
As Introduced
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 950
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 951
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 952
of the school; 953
(5) Internal financial controls. 954
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 955
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 956
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 957
authority of the school. 958
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 959
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 960
community school may provide for the community school governing 961
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 962
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 963
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 964
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 965
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 966
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 967
receives from the state. 968
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 969
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 970
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 971
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 972
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 973
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 974
contract; 975
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 976
performance and the organization and operation of the community 977
school on at least an annual basis; 978

H. B. No. 304 Page 35
As Introduced
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 979
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 980
contract; 981
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 982
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 983
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 984
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 985
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 986
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 987
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 988
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 989
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 990
closes prior to the end of a school year. 991
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 992
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 993
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 994
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 995
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 996
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 997
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 998
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 999
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 1000
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 1001
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 1002
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 1003
within one year after the contract entered into under this 1004
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 1005
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 1006
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 1007
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 1008

H. B. No. 304 Page 36
As Introduced
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 1009
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 1010
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 1011
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 1012
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 1013
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 1014
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 1015
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 1016
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 1017
3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 1018
3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 1019
3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 1020
3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 1021
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 1022
3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 1023
3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 1024
3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 1025
3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 1026
3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 1027
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 1028
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 1029
3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 1030
3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.90, 1031
3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 1032
3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 1033
3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 1034
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 1035
2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 1036
4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 1037
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 1038
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 1039

H. B. No. 304 Page 37
As Introduced
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 1040
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 1041
3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 1042
3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 1043
3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 1044
3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 1045
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 1046
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 1047
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 1048
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 1049
were a district board of education. 1050
Section 2. That existing sections 3313.48, 3313.603, 1051
3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby 1052
repealed. 1053
Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle 1054
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 1055
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 1056
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 1057
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 1058
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 1059
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 1060
as presented in this act: 1061
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 1062
H.B. 214, H.B. 250, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 1063
all of the 135th General Assembly. 1064
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 1065
H.B. 47, H.B. 214, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 1066
all of the 135th General Assembly. 1067
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 1068

H. B. No. 304 Page 38
As Introduced
S.B. 208 and S.B. 234 of the 135th General Assembly. 1069